Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2004
Filing fee; waived.

No fee of any kind shall be required by the Secretary of State for any filings made under sections 2-2001 and 2-2002.

Laws 1949, c. 2, § 4, p. 58.